Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB522.
hereby enacts as follows:CHAPTER 1PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Lake Erie Energy Development Act.Section 102. Legislative declaration.The General Assembly declares that the Commonwealth owns and holds in trust as public natural resources under section 27 of Article I of the Constitution of Pennsylvania the portion of 20250HB0522PN0515 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Lake Erie located in Pennsylvania, including the bed of Lake Erie and the associated wind, air, water and solar resources.Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Fund." The Lake Erie Large-Scale Energy System Development Fund established under section 702."Large-scale energy system" or "system." A wind energy generation system at more than five megawatts as measured by the nameplate capacity of the system or a solar or kinetic energy system of at least five megawatts as measured by the nameplate capacity of the system, ancillary facilities and structures, including any electrical collection and transmission facilities, submerged electrical transmission cables and other related structures.CHAPTER 3LEASING OF SUBMERGED LANDS AND USE OF THEASSOCIATED WIND, WATER AND SOLAR RESOURCESSection 301. Authority and duties of department.(a) Authorization.--The department, acting on behalf of the Commonwealth and in consultation with the Department of General Services, may, in accordance with this act:(1) Lease submerged lands equal to or greater than 25 acres, but not in excess of 10,000 contiguous acres, within the bed of Lake Erie in Erie County.(2) In association with the lease of the submerged lands in paragraph (1), allow the use of the wind, water and solar 20250HB0522PN0515 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 resources of Lake Erie in Pennsylvania.(b) Areas to be leased.--The department shall develop a map designating the areas of the bed of Lake Erie that may be considered for leasing for large-scale energy system development in consultation with the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources, the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission and the Pennsylvania Game Commission. The department shall ensure that the areas that may be leased:(1) are concentrated in the central and western portion of Lake Erie;(2) avoid development in nearshore areas;(3) avoid shipping lanes; and(4) avoid areas of Lake Erie and pathways where migratory species are concentrated.(c) Bidding process.--The department has the power to make and execute leases in the name of the Commonwealth, in consultation with the Department of General Services, for the evaluation, development and operation of large-scale energy systems in Lake Erie, whenever it appears to the satisfaction of the department that it would be in the best interests of this Commonwealth. Any proposed leases under this act exceeding $1,000 in value shall be advertised once a week for three weeks on the department's publicly accessible Internet website and in the Pennsylvania Bulletin in advance of awarding the leases. The leases may then be awarded to the highest and best bidder, who must give bond for the proper performance of the leases as the department designates. The requirement of competitive bidding may be waived, and the department may enter into leases with approval of the Governor, and upon terms and conditions as the department deems to be in the best interest of this 20250HB0522PN0515 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth, which at a minimum shall include:(1) A demonstration by the bidders of their expertise, experience and financial capacity to conduct a feasibility study and to develop such a system.(2) A certification that the bidder has the financial capability to cover all costs associated with the feasibility study and interconnecting to an energy distribution system.(3) A demonstration by the bidders of the benefits to be accrued by the Commonwealth, including:(i) The number of full-time jobs to be created.(ii) The overall economic impact of the proposed system.(iii) The environmental benefits of the system.(iv) The overall need for the system.(v) The amount of power to be provided by the proposed system.(vi) An initial assessment of community and public acceptance of the proposed system.Section 302. Qualifications of lessees.The initial feasibility study leases and long-term leases approved under this act shall be restricted to lessees that:(1) Demonstrate the expertise and capability to develop large-scale energy systems in a marine environment.(2) Have been deemed to be qualified bidders by the department.(3) File with the department a bond payable to the Commonwealth to cover the entire cost associated with the removal of facilities developed under this act and located in submerged lands of Lake Erie.(4) Demonstrate compliance with fair wage standards, 20250HB0522PN0515 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including compliance with the provisions of the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act, related to all work undertaken under this act.Section 303. Waters of this Commonwealth.A lease and any subsequent long-term lease approved under this act shall ensure reasonable accommodation for fishing, maritime commerce, energy transmission rights-of-way and other current and future commercial and recreational uses of the waters of this Commonwealth held in the public trust.Section 304. Term of leases.(a) Term of initial feasibility leases.--(1) The term of initial feasibility leases shall be for a term of up to seven years. The department may upon sufficient justification renew the initial feasibility leases for additional three-year terms.(2) In the event a lessee does not develop the parcel studied or contiguous parcels of submerged lands by installing a large-scale energy system in accordance with a subsequent long-term lease as provided in subsection (b), the lease shall terminate.(b) Term of long-term lease.--(1) A lessee under subsection (a) may be eligible to enter into a long-term lease for a large-scale energy system.(2) The department, based upon satisfactory evidence that the lessee is capable of long-term operation of the large-scale energy system, may enter into a long-term lease with an initial term of up to 35 years for the construction, operation, maintenance and removal of a large-scale energy system and any associated transmission facilities in Lake 20250HB0522PN0515 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Erie.(3) The initial long-term lease may be extended for all or any portion of the leased premises for additional terms of up to 35 years upon finding that it serves the best interest of the Commonwealth.(4) The long-term lease shall contain a provision for termination if the lessee has not completed construction of the large-scale energy system within a reasonable period of time to be established in the terms of the lease.(5) The department may allow, as an option to the long-term lease, the ability of the lessee to lease contiguous parcels. The department shall have the authority to determine the size of the contiguous parcels but not to exceed increments of 10,000 acres.Section 305. Lease agreements.(a) Approvals.--The leases authorized by this act shall be approved as to form and legality by the Attorney General and the Office of General Counsel, which approvals may not be unreasonably withheld, in accordance with law and shall be executed by the department in the name of the Commonwealth.(b) Lessee rights under lease.--A lease shall grant the lessee the right to use the premises in accordance with this act for the purposes of conducting a feasibility study and development of large-scale energy systems.Section 306. Feasibility study.(a) Initial lease.--Prior to entering into a long-term lease in accordance with section 304(b), an initial lessee shall conduct a feasibility study to assess the ability of the large-scale energy system to be viable and to assess the environmental, navigational, public safety, structural and any 20250HB0522PN0515 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other impacts and siting considerations necessary to the successful development of such a system.(b) Environmental impact.--In addition to the evaluation of environmental impacts associated with all other Federal and State authorizations required, the environmental impacts to be assessed and mitigated to the satisfaction of the department shall include:(1) The impacts to fishing and migratory bird and mammal routes.(2) The impacts to the ecosystems and habitats within and adjacent to Lake Erie.(3) Ecological impacts, including to fish-spawning beds and other habitats of importance, for all species, including ecologically valued species and sportfish, such as steelhead and lake trout, which are important to the local economy of the Lake Erie region.(c) Siting considerations.--The siting considerations to be considered and addressed shall include:(1) Site conditions, including wind speed, ice, lakebed, waves and currents.(2) Geophysical conditions and geohazards, including impacts on sediment transport, beach replenishment and bluff protection.(3) Ports and infrastructure, including the availability of support facilities in Pennsylvania and the region, existing supply chain and supply chain strategies and an analysis of harms and benefits to navigation and the recreation industry.(4) Fixed and floating technology options.(5) Interconnection, such as access to onshore energy 20250HB0522PN0515 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure, including existing local generation assets, electric load and the potential interconnection and integration of the electric grid.(6) Cost projection modeling and financing assumptions.(7) Economic development and opportunities for employment and workforce development.(8) Federal and State permitting considerations, including the potential to disturb cultural, archaeological and historical resources.(9) In addition to environmental impact analysis, environmental risk, benefit and mitigation analysis, including impacts on or improvement to cumulative impacts on air quality, water quality and the local ecology.(10) Ecological and human health and safety considerations, such as reduction or mitigation of noise, vibration and harmonics, flicker or other impacts to those living or working near the site, including recreational or commercial fisheries, tourism and viewshed.(11) Public support and an equity benefit analysis.(d) Use of study.--The department shall utilize the results of the feasibility study, as part of the review process associated with lease approval or disapproval under this act.Section 307. Improvements.Development of the parcels authorized to be leased by this act shall be for large-scale energy systems, including electrical collection and transmission facilities, submerged electrical transmission cables and other related structures. This act does not authorize the department to grant any property interest outside of the bed of Lake Erie. A lessee under this act shall obtain all rights of way, easements and other 20250HB0522PN0515 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 necessary property rights outside of the bed of Lake Erie necessary for conducting the lessee's operations under a lease entered into under this act.Section 308. Covenants.The conditions imposed under this act shall be covenants that run with the land and shall be binding upon the lessee. Should the lessee permit the parcels authorized to be leased under this act, or any portion thereof, to be used in a manner inconsistent with the conditions contained in this act, all rights and interests in the lease authorized by this act shall terminate immediately.Section 309. Federal and State law and permits.No feasibility study, construction, installation or operation of large-scale energy systems or other related structures on the lands subject to lease shall occur without adherence to Federal and State laws and prior receipt of all applicable Federal and State permits, certifications, authorizations or other approvals.CHAPTER 5ADMINISTRATIONSection 501. Regulations.The Environmental Quality Board may, for purposes of the leasing of the bed of Lake Erie for large-scale energy system development under this act, adopt regulations which at a minimum:(1) Determine minimum standards for the technology used to construct large-scale energy systems on and to transmit electricity from the areas of Lake Erie leased for that purpose.(2) Establish procedures for the conduct of feasibility 20250HB0522PN0515 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 studies by large-scale energy system developers related to the siting, economics and environmental issues of a system.(3) Establish reasonable fees to cover the costs incurred by the department and directly related to the preparation, review, execution of lease or other agreements associated with this act.(4) Establish a process for the developer of the large-scale energy system to demonstrate community and public acceptance of the proposed system.(5) Establish siting, design and other technical specifications and requirements.(6) Establish any other requirements that the department determines are necessary to implement or administer this act.(7) Prohibit lessees from entering into subleases.Section 502. Sublease by department prohibited.The department may not enter into subleases or nondisturbance agreements on any of the submerged lands of Lake Erie.Section 503. Transfer of interest prohibited.Except as provided in section 301, this act does not authorize or otherwise allow for or include any transfer of any mineral or other surface or subsurface interest associated with the submerged lands of Lake Erie.Section 504. Construction.Except as provided in section 301, nothing in this act shall be construed to affect or otherwise limit the provisions of the act of November 26, 1978 (P.L.1375, No.325), known as the Dam Safety and Encroachments Act, that may require further measures to provide for public access and use of the land and adjacent water.Section 505. Interagency responsibilities.20250HB0522PN0515 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The department shall work cooperatively with:(1) The Department of General Services to ensure that all of the systems under this act satisfy all requirements under this act, all requirements for form and legality, all applicable environmental standards and all environmental permit requirements.(2) The Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission to establish that the proposed large-scale energy system is viable, both economically and from an energy production perspective. The Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission shall assist the department in assessing all of the following:(i) The system's impact on ratepayers.(ii) Whether a bidder has sufficient resources.(iii) Whether a bidder has the ability to successfully complete all of the activities necessary for interconnection to the electric distribution system.CHAPTER 7ROYALTY PAYMENTS AND DISTRIBUTIONSSection 701. Royalty payments.Each lessee of a long-term lease under this act shall be subject to the payment to the Commonwealth of submerged lands occupation fees, development rental fees, bonuses and royalties from the energy generation and energy credits to be determined in the long-term lease. The operator of the system shall submit the royalty payment annually unless an alternative payment schedule is approved by the department. The operator shall submit the initial royalty payment beginning January 1 of the year following the system's being placed into production.Section 702. Lake Erie Large-Scale Energy System Development Fund.20250HB0522PN0515 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Establishment.--The Lake Erie Large-Scale Energy System Development Fund is established in the State Treasury. The fund shall be used as provided by this act to conserve and maintain Lake Erie public natural resources. The money in the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis for the distributions and transfers provided under section 703.(b) Deposits.--All development rental, bonus and royalty payments from energy generation and energy credits from large-scale energy systems situated in Lake Erie shall be deposited into the fund.Section 703. Distributions and transfers.On the last business day of each calendar quarter, the State Treasurer shall make the following distributions and transfers from the fund:(1) Ten percent of the fund shall be distributed to the department for its administration of the leases under this act and for waters of this Commonwealth conservation and maintenance projects.(2) Twenty percent of the fund shall be distributed to the department for payment to Erie County for public natural resource conservation and maintenance related projects in the county.(3) Twenty percent of the fund shall be distributed to the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission for programs, projects or other activities related to conservation and maintenance projects associated with Lake Erie.(4) Thirty percent of the fund shall be transferred to the Energy Development Fund to support efforts by the Pennsylvania Energy Development Authority for energy efficiency, renewable energy or clean energy projects that 20250HB0522PN0515 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reduce air pollution or improve air quality.(5) Twenty percent of the fund shall be transferred to the Conservation District Fund for distribution to Lake Erie Watershed county conservation districts consistent with guidelines established by the State Conservation Commission for public natural resource conservation and maintenance projects.Section 704. Submerged lands lease consideration.Submerged lands occupation fees for the use and occupation in, along, under, across or over the bed of Lake Erie as described in this act shall be reasonable to compensate for the use and occupation of the bed of Lake Erie and shall be deposited into the Clean Water Fund.CHAPTER 9MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 901. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250HB0522PN0515 - 14 - 1234567891011121314151617